California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) Commencing on July 1, 2025, and every other year thereafter, the department shall review and update the rate models per the cost inputs available at the time of the review and shall post the updated rate models on its internet website no later than January 1 of the following year.

(b) An adjustment to a provider rate pursuant to the updated rate models shall be contingent upon the appropriation of funds by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act and approval of federal funding.

(c) For purposes of this section, “rate model” means a rate model included in the rate study submitted to the Legislature pursuant to Section 4519.8.

(d) Operative through December 31, 2030, contracts and contract amendments to procure services to implement this section are exempt from the requirements of the Public Contract Code and the State Administrative Manual, and from approval by the Department of General Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 22.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4519.12.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department and regional centers actively partner with and support regional center service providers to successfully meet the benchmarks of the quality incentive program.

(b) The department and regional centers shall continue and enhance robust ongoing technical assistance, training, and operational guidance to service providers.

(c) The department shall use the data collected through the quality incentive program to understand and address provider capacity needs in the system and inform and develop the infrastructure necessary to track and achieve quality outcomes.

(d) The department shall make data collection requirements clear and accessible, and ensure they do not place an undue administrative burden on service providers.

(e) The department shall evaluate the reasons why some providers have been unable to access the quality incentive rate increment for the 2026–27 fiscal year. The department and regional centers shall support service providers in meeting the qualifying prerequisites to maximize access to the quality incentive rate increment for the 2027–28 fiscal year and ongoing, immediately following the department’s issuance of quality incentive measures for each fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 23.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. State Council On Developmental Disabilities [4520. - 4555.]



  ARTICLE 1. Composition and Appointments [4520. - 4523.]

4520.

(a) A State Council on Developmental Disabilities with authority independent of any single state service agency is hereby created.

(b) The Legislature finds that in each of the 56 states and territories, the federal Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of 2000 (Public Law 106-402 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 15001 et seq.)) establishes State Councils on Developmental Disabilities that work to promote the core values of the act, including self-determination, independence, productivity, integration, and inclusion in all aspects of community life.

(c) The Legislature finds that California’s State Council on Developmental Disabilities was established
 pursuant to the federal Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of 2000 to engage in advocacy, capacity building, and systemic change activities that are consistent with the policy contained in federal law and contribute to a coordinated, consumer- and family-centered, consumer- and family-directed, comprehensive system that includes the provision of needed community services, individualized supports, and other forms of assistance that promote self-determination for individuals with developmental disabilities and their families. It is the intent of the Legislature that the state council independently exercise its authority and responsibilities under federal law, expend its federal funding allocation, and exercise all powers and duties that may be necessary to carry out the purposes contained in applicable federal law.

(d) The Legislature finds that the federal Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of
 2000 requires the council to promote certain principles that include all of the following:

(1) Individuals with developmental disabilities, including those with the most severe developmental disabilities, are capable of self-determination, independence, productivity, and integration and inclusion in all facets of community life, but often require the provision of community services, individualized supports, and other forms of assistance.

(2) Individuals with developmental disabilities and their families have competencies, capabilities, and personal goals that should be recognized, supported, and encouraged, and any assistance to these individuals should be provided in an individualized manner, consistent with the unique strengths, resources, priorities, concerns, abilities, and capabilities of these individuals.

(3) Individuals with developmental disabilities and their families are the primary decisionmakers regarding the services and supports these individuals and their families receive, including choosing where an individual lives from available options, and have decisionmaking roles in policies and programs that affect the lives of these individuals and their families.

(e) (1) The Legislature finds that the state council faces unique challenges in ensuring access and furthering these principles due to the state’s size, diversity, and a service delivery system that promotes significant local control.

(2) Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature that the state council, consistent with its authority and responsibilities under federal law, ensure that the council is accessible and responsive to the diverse geographic, racial, ethnic, and language
 needs of individuals with developmental disabilities and their families throughout California, which in part may, as determined by the state council, be achieved through the establishment of regional offices, the number and location of which may be determined by the state council.

(f) This chapter, Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 4561), and Division 4.7 (commencing with Section 4900), are intended by the Legislature to secure full compliance with the requirements of the federal Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of 2000 as amended and extended, which provides federal funds to assist the state in planning, coordinating, monitoring, and evaluating services for persons with developmental disabilities and in establishing a system to protect and advocate the legal and civil rights of persons with developmental disabilities.

(g) The state council may use
 funds and other moneys allocated to the state council in accordance with the purposes of the federal Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of 2000. This section does not preclude the state council from using moneys other than moneys provided through the federal Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of 2000 in any manner consistent with applicable federal and state law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 575.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4520.5.

Notwithstanding any other law, the state council shall determine the structure of its organization, as required by the federal Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of 2000 (Public Law 106-402 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 15001 et seq.)).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 576.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4521.

(a) (1) All references to “council” or “state council” in this division shall be a reference to the State Council on Developmental Disabilities.

(2) “Developmental disability,” as used in this chapter, means a developmental disability as defined in Section 15002(8) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(b) There shall be 31 voting members on the state council appointed by the Governor from among the residents of the state, as follows:

(1) (A) Twenty members of the council shall be nonagency members who reflect the socioeconomic, geographic, disability,
 racial, ethnic, and language diversity of the state, and who shall be persons with a developmental disability or their parents, immediate relatives, guardians, or conservators residing in California. Of the 20 members:

(i) At least seven members shall be persons with developmental disabilities.

(ii) At least seven members shall be a person who is a parent, immediate relative, guardian, or conservator of a person with a developmental disability.

(iii) At least one of the members shall be a person with a developmental disability who is a current or former resident of an institution or his or her immediate relative, guardian, or conservator.

(B) To ensure that state council membership is geographically representative, as required by federal law, the
 Governor shall appoint the members described in clauses (i) and (ii) of subparagraph (A) from the geographical area of each regional office, if regional offices have been established by the council. Each member described in clauses (i) and (ii) of subparagraph (A) may, in the discretion of the state council, serve as a liaison from the state council to consumers and family members in the geographical area that he or she is from.

(2) Eleven members of the council shall include the following:

(A) The Secretary of California Health and Human Services, or his or her designee, who shall represent the agency and the state agency that administers funds under Title XIX of the Social Security Act for people with developmental disabilities.

(B) The Director of Developmental Services or his or her designee.

(C) The Director of Rehabilitation or his or her designee.

(D) The Superintendent of Public Instruction or his or her designee.

(E) A representative from a nongovernmental agency or group concerned with the provision of services to persons with developmental disabilities.

(F) One representative from each of the three university centers for excellence in the state, pursuant to Section 15061 et seq. of Title 42 of the United States Code, providing training in the field of developmental services, or his or her designee. These individuals shall have expertise in the field of developmental disabilities.

(G) The Director of Health Care Services or his or her designee.

(H) The executive director of the agency established in California to fulfill the requirements and assurance of Title I, Subtitle C, of the federal Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of 2000 for a system to protect and advocate the rights of persons with developmental disabilities, or his or her designee.

(I) The Director of the California Department of Aging or his or her designee.

(c) Prior to appointing the members described in paragraph (1) of, and subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of, subdivision (b), the Governor shall consult with the current members of the council, including nonagency members of the council, and consider recommendations from organizations representing persons with a broad range of developmental disabilities, or persons interested in, or providing services to, or both,
 persons with developmental disabilities.

(d) The term of each member described in paragraph (1) of, and subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of, subdivision (b) shall be for three years. The term of these members shall begin on the date of appointment by the Governor and these members shall serve no more than two terms.

(e) A member may continue to serve following the expiration of his or her term until the Governor appoints that member’s successor. The state council shall notify the Governor regarding membership requirements of the council and shall notify the Governor, in writing, immediately when a vacancy occurs prior to the expiration of a member’s term, at least six months before a member’s term expires, and when a vacancy on the council remains unfilled for more than 60 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 577.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4521.5.

Notwithstanding Section 7.5 of the Government Code, each designee shall act as the member in his or her place and stead to all intents and purposes as though the director or secretary were personally present, including the right of the designee to be counted in constituting a quorum to participate in the proceeding of the state council and to vote upon any and all matters.

Each designee shall have the right to represent the director or secretary who appointed him or her regardless of the number of other designees representing directors or secretaries at a particular meeting or session of the state council. Each designee shall represent only one director or secretary at any meeting or session of the state council.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 419, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

4521.6.

For purposes of this chapter, the Governor’s appointment of the Secretary of Health and Human Services, the Director of the California Department of Aging, Director of Developmental Services, Director of Health Services, and Director of the Department of Rehabilitation shall also constitute his or her appointment as a member of the State Council on Developmental Disabilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 676, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

4522.

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent the reappointment or replacement of any individual presently serving on the existing state council if the reappointment or replacement is in conformity with all of the criteria established in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 676, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

4523.

Persons appointed to membership on the state council shall have demonstrated interest and leadership in human service activities, including interest in Californians who have developmental disabilities, their families, services, and supports.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 676, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Conflict of Interest [4525. - 4525.]

4525.

(a) In order to prevent any potential conflicts of interest, members of the state council may not be employees of a state, local, or private agency or facility that provides services to persons with a developmental disability, or be members of the governing board of any entity providing the service, when the service is funded in whole or in part with state funds.

(b) For purposes of this section, “employees of a state, local, or private agency or facility that provides services to persons with a developmental disability” shall not be deemed to include any of the following:

(1) A parent, relative, guardian or conservator,
 who receives public funds expressly for the purpose of providing direct services to his or her child, relative, ward or conservatee, respectively, who is a person with a developmental disability.

(2) A person with a developmental disability who receives employment services through a provider receiving state or federal funds, or who receives funds directly to pay for his or her own services and supports.

(3) A person who serves as a member of a regional advisory committee of the state council, established pursuant to Article 6.

(c) This section shall not apply to the appointments made pursuant to subparagraphs (A), (B), (C), (D), (F), (G), (H), and (I) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 4521.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 409, Sec. 8.   (AB 1595)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Designated State Agency [4530. - 4530.]

4530.

(a) The California Health and Human Services Agency shall be the designated state agency for support to the state council. The agency secretary shall ensure the state council is provided efficient accounting, financial management, personnel, and other reasonable support services when requested by the council in the performance of its mandated responsibilities.

(b) The designation of the California Health and Human Services Agency shall not limit the council’s scope of concern to health programs or limit the council’s responsibilities or functions regarding all other pertinent state and local programs, as defined in Article 5 (commencing with Section 4540) of this chapter.

(c) The designation of the California Health and Human Services Agency shall not interfere in any way with the provisions of Section 4552 requiring all personnel employed by the council to be solely responsible, organizationally and administratively, to the council.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 409, Sec. 10.   (AB 1595)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Organization [4535. - 4535.]

4535.

(a) The state council shall meet at least six times per year, and, upon call of its chairperson, as often as necessary to fulfill its duties. All meetings and records of the state council shall be open to the public.

(b) The state council shall, by majority vote of the voting members, elect its own chairperson and vice chairperson who shall have full voting rights on all state council actions, from among the appointed members, described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 4521. The council shall establish any committees it deems necessary or desirable. The chairperson shall appoint all members of committees of the state council. The chairs and vice chairs of the state
 council and its standing committees shall be individuals with a developmental disability, or the parent, sibling, guardian, or conservator of an individual with a developmental disability.

(c) The state council may appoint technical advisory consultants and may establish committees composed of professional persons serving persons with developmental disabilities as necessary for technical assistance. The state council may call upon representatives of all agencies receiving state or federal funds for assistance and information, and shall invite persons with developmental disabilities, their parents, guardians, or conservators, professionals, or members of the general public to participate on state council committees, when appropriate.

(d) When convening any task force or advisory group, the state council shall make its best effort to ensure representation by consumers and family
 members representing the state’s multicultural diversity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 409, Sec. 11.   (AB 1595)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. State Council Functions [4540. - 4541.]

4540.

The state council, established pursuant to the federal Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of 2000 (Public Law 106-402 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 15001 et seq.)), shall do all of the following:

(a) Serve as an advocate for individuals with developmental disabilities and, through council members, staff, consultants, and contractors and grantees, conduct advocacy, capacity building, and systemic change activities.

(b) Develop and implement the state plan in accordance with requirements issued by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services, monitor and evaluate the implementation of this plan, and submit reports as the United States Secretary of Health and
 Human Services may reasonably request. The state council may review and comment on other plans and programs in the state affecting individuals with developmental disabilities.

(c) Serve as the official agency responsible for planning the provision of the federal funds allotted to the state under Public Law 106-402 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 15001 et seq.), by conducting and supporting advocacy, capacity building, and systemic change activities. The council may itself conduct these activities and may provide grant funding to local agencies in compliance with applicable state and federal law, for those same purposes.

(d) Prepare and approve a budget, for the use of amounts paid to the state to hire any staff and to obtain the services of any professional, technical, or clerical personnel consistent with state and federal law, as the council determines to be necessary to carry out its
 functions.

(e) To the extent that resources are available, implement the state plan by conducting activities including, but not limited to, all of the activities specified in paragraphs (1) to (11), inclusive.

(1) Encouraging and assisting in the establishment or strengthening of self-advocacy organizations led by individuals with developmental disabilities.

(2) Supporting and conducting geographically based outreach activities to identify individuals with developmental disabilities and their families who otherwise might not come to the attention of the council and assist and enable the individuals and families to obtain services, individualized supports, and other forms of assistance, including access to special adaptation of generic community services or specialized services.

(3) Supporting and conducting training for persons who are individuals with developmental disabilities, their families, and personnel, including professionals, paraprofessionals, students, volunteers, and other community members, to enable those persons to obtain access to, or to provide, community services, individualized supports, and other forms of assistance, including special adaptation of generic community services or specialized services for individuals with developmental disabilities and their families.

(4) Supporting and conducting technical assistance activities to assist public and private entities to contribute to the objectives of the state plan.

(5) Supporting and conducting activities to assist neighborhoods and communities to respond positively to individuals with developmental disabilities and their
 families.

(6) Supporting and conducting activities to promote interagency collaboration and coordination at the state and local levels to better serve, support, assist, or advocate for individuals with developmental disabilities and their families.

(7) Coordinating with related councils, committees, and programs to enhance coordination of services.

(8) Supporting and conducting activities to eliminate barriers to access and use of community services by individuals with disabilities, enhance systems design and redesign, and enhance citizen participation to address issues identified in the state plan.

(9) Supporting and conducting activities to educate the public about the capabilities, preferences, and needs of individuals with developmental disabilities
 and their families, and to develop and support coalitions that support the policy agenda of the council, including training in self-advocacy, education of policymakers, and citizen leadership roles.

(10) Supporting and conducting activities to provide information to policymakers by supporting and conducting studies and analyses, gathering information, and developing and disseminating model policies and procedures, information, approaches, strategies, findings, conclusions, and recommendations. The council may provide the information directly to federal, state, and local policymakers, including the Congress of the United States, the federal executive branch, the Governor, the Legislature, and state agencies in order to increase the abilities of those policymakers to offer opportunities and enhance or adapt generic services to meet the needs of, or provide specialized services to, individuals with developmental disabilities and their
 families.

(11) Supporting, on a time-limited basis, activities to demonstrate new approaches to serving individuals with developmental disabilities that are a part of an overall strategy for systemic change.

(f) Prepare an annual written report of its activities, its recommendations, and an evaluation of the efficiency of the administration of this division to the Governor and the Legislature. This report shall include both the statewide and regional activities of the state council. This report shall be submitted to the Legislature in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(g) Except as otherwise provided in this division, the state council shall not engage in the administration of the day-to-day operation of service programs identified in the state plan, nor in the financial management and accounting
 of funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 578.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4541.

The state council may, in its discretion, and in addition to the activities specified in subdivision (e) of Section 4540, implement the state plan by conducting activities that may include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Appointing an authorized representative for persons with developmental disabilities according to all of the following:

(1) To ensure the protection of civil and service rights of persons with developmental disabilities, the state council may appoint a representative to assist the person in expressing his or her desires and in making decisions and advocating his or her needs, preferences, and choices, when the person with developmental disabilities has no
 parent, guardian, or conservator legally authorized to represent him or her and the person has either requested the appointment of a representative or the rights or interests of the person, as determined by the state council, will not be properly protected or advocated without the appointment of a representative.

(2) When there is no guardian or conservator, the individual’s choice, if expressed, including the right to reject the assistance of a representative, shall be honored. If the person does not express a preference, the order of preference for selection of the representative shall be the person’s parent, involved family members, or a volunteer selected by the state council. In establishing these preferences, it is the intent of the Legislature that parents or involved family members shall not be required to be appointed guardian or conservator in order to be selected. Unless the person with developmental disabilities expresses otherwise,
 or good cause otherwise exists, the request of the parents or involved family members to be appointed the representative shall be honored.

(3) Pursuant to this section, the state council shall appoint a representative to advocate the rights and protect the interest of a person residing in a developmental center for whom community placement is proposed pursuant to Section 4803. The representative may obtain the advocacy assistance of the regional center clients’ rights advocate.

(b) Conducting public hearings and forums and the evaluation and issuance of public reports on the programs identified in the state plan, as may be necessary to carry out the duties of the state council.

(c) Identifying the denial of rights of persons with disabilities and informing the appropriate local, state, or federal officials of their
 findings, and assisting these officials in eliminating all forms of discrimination against persons with developmental disabilities in housing, recreation, education, health and mental health care, employment, and other service programs available to the general population.

(d) Reviewing and commenting on pertinent portions of the proposed plans and budgets of all state agencies serving persons with developmental disabilities including, but not limited to, the State Department of Education, the Department of Rehabilitation, and the State Department of Developmental Services, and local agencies to the extent resources allow.

(e) (1) Promoting systems change and implementation by reviewing the policies and practices of publicly funded agencies that serve or may serve persons with developmental disabilities to determine if the programs are meeting their
 obligations, under local, state, and federal laws. If the state council finds that the agency is not meeting its obligations, the state council may inform the director and the governing board of the noncomplying agency, in writing, of its findings.

(2) Within 15 days, the agency shall respond, in writing, to the state council’s findings. Following receipt of the agency’s response, if the state council continues to find that the agency is not meeting its obligations, the state council may pursue informal efforts to resolve the issue.

(3) If, within 30 days of implementing informal efforts to resolve the issue, the state council continues to find that the agency is not meeting its obligations under local, state, or federal statutes, the state council may conduct a public hearing to receive testimony on its findings.

(4) The state council may take any action it deems necessary to resolve the problem.

(f) Reviewing and publicly commenting on significant regulations proposed to be promulgated by any state agency in the implementation of this division.

(g) Monitoring and evaluating the effectiveness of appeals procedures established in this division.

(h) Providing testimony to legislative committees reviewing fiscal or policy matters pertaining to persons with developmental disabilities.

(i) Conducting, or causing to be conducted, investigations or public hearings to resolve disagreements between state agencies, or between state and regional or local agencies, or between persons with developmental disabilities and agencies receiving state funds. These
 investigations or public hearings shall be conducted at the discretion of the state council only after all other appropriate administrative procedures for appeal, as established in state and federal law, have been fully utilized.

(j) Any other activities prescribed in statute that are consistent with the purposes of the federal Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of 2000 (Public Law 106-402 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 15001 et seq.)) and the state plan developed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 4540.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 579.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. State Council Regional Offices and Advisory Committees [4544. - 4548.]

4544.

(a) (1) The state council may establish regional offices that are accessible to and responsive to the diverse geographic, ethnic, and language needs of consumers and families throughout the state. As of January 1, 2015, regional offices of the state council in existence as of December 31, 2014, shall continue to exist, within the same geographic regions of the state.

(2) Effective January 1, 2015, the state council shall have full authority to establish, maintain, and operate regional offices, including the number and location of those offices.

(b) To ensure involvement of persons with developmental
 disabilities, their families, and other members of the public at the regional level and to ensure the responsiveness of the state council to the geographic, ethnic, and language diversity of the state, any regional office established by the state council may be advised by a regional advisory committee. As of January 1, 2015, advisory boards of the regional offices, known as area boards on developmental disabilities, in existence on December 31, 2014, shall thereafter be known as state council regional advisory committees.

(c) All references to “regional office” in this chapter shall be a reference to state council regional offices. All references to “regional advisory committees” in this chapter shall be a reference to state council regional advisory committees.

(d) Any state council regional offices and advisory committees established by the state council shall be constituted and
 shall operate according to policies and procedures that may be established by the council.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 409, Sec. 16.   (AB 1595)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4545.

The state council may periodically review the number and geographic boundaries of regional offices needed to effectively implement this division, by methods including, but not limited to, conducting public hearings in affected regions and seeking input from regional advisory committees, persons with developmental disabilities, family members, service providers, advocates, and other interested parties. Public notice shall be provided at least 120 days before any changes in the number of or boundaries of regional offices.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 409, Sec. 18.   (AB 1595)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4546.

The membership of any regional advisory committees established or continued by the state council prior to January 1, 2015, shall, upon expiration of the terms of individuals who are members of those committees on January 1, 2015, be determined through policies and procedures established by the council.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 409, Sec. 20.   (AB 1595)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4548.

Any regional advisory committee established shall, at the request of the state council, do all of the following:

(a) Advise the state council and its regional office on local issues and identify and provide input regarding local systemic needs within its community.

(b) Provide input and be a source of data for the state council to consider in the formulation of the state plan.

(c) Provide public information programs for consumers, families, professional groups, and for the general public to increase professional and public awareness of areas identified in the state plan.

(d) Engage in other activities as requested by the state council.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 409, Sec. 23.   (AB 1595)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. State Council Costs and Support Services [4550. - 4555.]

4550.

The state council’s operating costs may include honoraria for state council members and actual and necessary expenses for state council members and regional advisory committee members, as described in this article, and other administrative, professional, and secretarial support services necessary to the operation of the state council. Federal developmental disability funds received by the state under Public Law 106-402 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 15001 et seq.), shall be allotted in any one year for these operating costs. Each member of the state council shall receive one hundred dollars ($100) per day for each full day of work performed directly related to council business, not to exceed 50 days in any fiscal year, and shall be reimbursed for any actual and necessary expenses
 incurred in connection with the performance of their duties under this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 409, Sec. 25.   (AB 1595)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4551.

(a) Within the limit of funds allotted for these purposes, the state council shall appoint an executive director. All state council employees that the state council may require shall be appointed by the executive director.

(b) The executive director of the state council shall be exempt from civil service. All state council staff positions exempt from civil service on December 31, 2014, shall remain exempt on January 1, 2015, and thereafter, until the position becomes vacant or is transitioned to a civil service position.

(c) Each person who is a member of the state council staff, is exempt from civil service, and is
 employed by the state council on December 31, 2014, shall continue to be employed in a job classification at the same or higher salary by the state council on January 1, 2015, and thereafter, unless he or she resigns or is terminated from employment.

(d) The state council may transition staff positions that were exempt from civil service on December 31, 2014, to civil service positions. Civil service positions shall be established for any positions that are transitioned pursuant to this subdivision.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, a person who was a state council employee exempt from civil service on December 31, 2014, shall be eligible to apply for civil service examinations, including promotional civil service examinations described in Section 18992 of the Government Code. A person receiving a passing score shall have his or her name placed on lists resulting from these
 examinations, or otherwise gain eligibility for appointment. In evaluating minimum qualifications, experience in state council exempt positions shall be considered state civil service experience in a class deemed comparable by the State Personnel Board, based on the duties and responsibilities assigned.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 409, Sec. 27.   (AB 1595)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4552.

The state council may contract for additional assistance with any public or private agency or individual to carry out planning, monitoring, evaluation, and other responsibilities under this division. In order to comply with Public Law 106-402 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 15001 et seq.) regulations, all personnel employed by the state council shall be solely responsible, organizationally and administratively, to the state council. The state council, through its executive director, shall have responsibility for the selection, hiring, and supervision of all its personnel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 409, Sec. 28.   (AB 1595)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4552.5.

The state council may request information, records, and documents from any other agency of state government, except for confidential patient records. These agencies shall comply with the reasonable requests of the state council.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 676, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

4553.

To the extent provided in Public Law 106-402 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 15001 et seq.), the state council shall have full authority on how it uses its funds for implementation of the state plan, including establishing, maintaining, and operating any regional offices.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 409, Sec. 30.   (AB 1595)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4555.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any contract entered into between the State of California and the state council may provide for periodic advanced payments for services to be performed under the contract. No advanced payment made pursuant to this section shall exceed 25 percent of the total annual contract amount.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 676, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. California Developmental Disabilities State Plan [4561. - 4568.]

4561.

(a) A state plan shall be prepared by the state council not less often than once every five years, and shall be reviewed and revised, as necessary, on an annual basis. All references in this part to “state plan” shall be references to the state plan described by Public Law 106-402 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 15001 et seq.).
